Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0708.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1a. (1) Beginning on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, a memorial designation under this act may be made only subject to all of the following: (a) Not more than 10 memorial designations may be made in a calendar year. (b) A highway or other infrastructure designated under this act must not be designated for another subject for a period of 10 years. (c) A memorial designation may be made only for an eligible subject as described in section 1b. (2) Subsection (1) applies to the designation of any infrastructure under this act, including, but not limited to, a highway, freeway, bridge, overpass, interchange, or trail. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 709 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.